Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 50-1801 to 50-1821 shall be known and may be cited as the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB347, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB207, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2024, § 43-4301;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 24.